Rhode Island, session 2025, SB630.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Findings.
The general assembly finds and declares that ensuring transparency in the electric and gas
billing process is a matter of critical public importance. Consumers have a right to clearly
understand the components of their utility bills including, but not limited to, supply charges,
delivery charges, and any public policy costs related to renewable energy and public benefits
programs. To further these goals, it is imperative that utility companies provide detailed
breakdowns of these charges in an easily understandable manner on each bill.
SECTION 2. Title 39 of the General Laws entitled "PUBLIC UTILITIES AND
CARRIERS" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 36
TRANSPARENCY IN ELECTRIC AND GAS BILLS ACT
39-36-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Transparency in Electric and Gas
Bills Act".
39-36-2. Definitions.
For the purposes of this chapter, the following words and terms have the following
meanings:
(1) "Supply charges" means the cost of generating or procuring electricity or gas for the

customer.
(2) "Delivery charges" means the cost associated with the transmission and distribution of
electricity or gas to the customer’s premises.
(3) "Public policy" costs refers to costs mandated by federal, state, or local policy to support
renewable energy mandates, energy efficiency programs, and public benefits programs.
(4) "Renewable energy sources" refers to energy generation from wind, solar, hydro,
geothermal, or any other sources deemed renewable by the public utilities commission (“PUC”).
39-36-3. Utility bill breakdown requirements.
(a) Beginning on July 1, 2025, all electric and gas utilities operating in the state shall
include, on each bill issued to a residential or commercial customer, a clear and itemized breakdown
of all charges. This breakdown shall include the following:
(1) Supply charges. A clear itemization of the charges for electricity and gas supply,
including a separate line item indicating the portion of the supply charge attributable to each
renewable energy source, broken down by wind, solar, hydro, geothermal, and any other renewable
sources, utilized by the utility to meet the customer’s needs.
(2) Delivery charges. A separate line item indicating the charges for the delivery of
electricity or gas to the customer’s premises.
(3) Public policy costs. A separate line item indicating all public policy costs associated
with the customer’s bill. This shall include, but not be limited to, costs for renewable energy credits
(hereinafter referred to in this chapter as “RECs”), energy efficiency programs, and other programs
related to state or federal renewable energy mandates.
(4) Breakdown of renewable energy mandates. A further itemization within the supply
charges to indicate the costs associated with specific renewable energy mandates. Each renewable
energy mandate should be individually identified with an associated cost breakdown including, but
not limited to:
(i) Wind energy mandates;
(ii) Solar energy mandates;
(iii) Hydro energy mandates;
(iv) Geothermal energy mandates; or
(v) Any other renewable energy mandates.
(b) The bill shall provide an explanation of how the customer’s costs for each renewable
energy source are determined, including the methodology used to allocate these costs and the
percentage of the customer’s supply charge attributed to each renewable energy source.
(c) The utility shall make reasonable efforts to ensure that this breakdown is presented in a
LC001883 - Page 2 of 4

user-friendly format that is easily readable and comprehensible to a typical residential or
commercial customer.
39-36-4. Public comment and review.
(a) Beginning on January 1, 2026, each utility shall submit to the public utilities
commission (“PUC”) a proposed plan for the implementation of the bill breakdown requirements
outlined in this chapter. The plan shall include sample bills and any technology or processes
required to ensure compliance with this section.
(b) The PUC shall hold a public comment period on the proposed bill breakdown plans for
a period of no less than sixty (60) days, during which time stakeholders, including residential and
commercial customers, consumer advocacy organizations, and other interested parties, may
provide feedback on the proposed plans.
(c) The PUC shall consider all comments and make any necessary revisions to the proposed
plans before approving the final implementation standards for the bill breakdown requirements.
39-36-5. Enforcement and compliance.
(a) Utilities shall be required to implement the finalized billing breakdown plans no later
than one year after the PUC approval of the final plan.
(b) The PUC shall have the authority to enforce compliance with the provisions of this
chapter. Any utility found in violation of these requirements shall be subject to penalties as
determined by the PUC including, but not limited to, fines or remedial actions to ensure
compliance.
39-36-6. Public outreach and education.
(a) The PUC shall conduct a public outreach and education campaign to ensure that
residential and commercial customers are aware of the changes to the billing system and can
understand the new bill breakdown. The outreach program may include, but is not limited to, public
service announcements, educational materials, and online resources.
(b) The PUC shall provide utilities with guidance and resources on best practices for
explaining the new breakdown of charges to customers, particularly focusing on the renewable
energy mandate breakdown.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001883
========
LC001883 - Page 3 of 4